de: Geräuschunterdrückungstechnologie: Aktive Geräuschunterdrückung (ANC); Adaptive Geräuschunterdrückung; Umgebungsgeräuschunterdrückung (ENC); Keine; Passive Geräuschisolierung; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 降噪技术: 主动降噪 (ANC); 自适应降噪; 环境降噪 (ENC); 无; 被动噪声隔离; 其他
pt-BR: Tecnologia de cancelamento de ruído: Cancelamento de ruído ativo (ANC); Cancelamento de ruído adaptativo; Cancelamento de ruído ambiental (ENC); Nenhum; Isolamento passivo de ruído; Outro
zh-TW: 降噪技術: 主動降噪（ANC）; 自適應降噪; 環境降噪（ENC）; 無; 被動隔音; 其他
ru: Технология шумоподавления: Активное шумоподавление (ANC); Адаптивное шумоподавление; Подавление окружающего шума (ENC); Нет; Пассивная шумоизоляция; Другой
hu: Zajcsökkentési technológia: Aktív zajcsökkentés (ANC); Adaptív zajcsökkentés; Környezeti zajcsökkentés (ENC); Egyik sem; Passzív zajszigetelés; Egyéb
el: Τεχνολογία ακύρωσης θορύβου: Ενεργή ακύρωση θορύβου (ANC); Προσαρμοστική ακύρωση θορύβου; Ακύρωση περιβαλλοντικού θορύβου (ENC); Καμία; Παθητική απομόνωση θορύβου; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tehnologie de anulare a zgomotului: Anulare activă a zgomotului (ANC); Anulare adaptivă a zgomotului; Anulare a zgomotului ambiental (ENC); Niciuna; Izolare pasivă a zgomotului; Altele
hr-HR: Tehnologija poništavanja buke: Aktivno poništavanje buke (ANC); Prilagodljivo poništavanje buke; Poništavanje buke iz okoline (ENC); Nema; Pasivna izolacija buke; Ostalo
ko: 노이즈 캔슬링 기술: 액티브 노이즈 캔슬링 (ANC); 적응형 노이즈 캔슬링; 환경 노이즈 캔슬링 (ENC); 없음; 패시브 노이즈 차단; 기타
nl: Ruisonderdrukkingstechnologie: Actieve ruisonderdrukking (ANC); Adaptieve ruisonderdrukking; Omgevingsruisonderdrukking (ENC); Geen; Passieve geluidsisolatie; Andere
en: Noise cancellation technology: Active noise cancellation (ANC); Adaptive noise cancellation; Environmental noise cancellation (ENC); None; Passive noise isolation; Other
da: Støjreduktionsteknologi: Aktiv støjreduktion (ANC); Adaptiv støjreduktion; Miljøstøjreduktion (ENC); Ingen; Passiv støjisolering; Andet
vi: Công nghệ khử tiếng ồn: Khử tiếng ồn chủ động (ANC); Khử tiếng ồn thích ứng; Khử tiếng ồn môi trường (ENC); Không có; Cách âm thụ động; Khác
cs: Technologie potlačení hluku: Aktivní potlačení šumu (ANC); Adaptivní potlačení šumu; Potlačení okolního šumu (ENC); Žádný; Pasivní izolace hluku; Jiné
ja: ノイズキャンセリング技術: アクティブノイズキャンセリング（ANC）; アダプティブノイズキャンセリング; 環境ノイズキャンセリング（ENC）; なし; パッシブノイズアイソレーション; その他
pl: Technologia redukcji szumów: Aktywna redukcja szumów (ANC); Adaptacyjna redukcja szumów; Redukcja szumów otoczenia (ENC); Brak; Pasywna izolacja szumów; Inne
sv: Brusreduceringsteknologi: Aktiv brusreducering (ANC); Adaptiv brusreducering; Miljöbrusreducering (ENC); Inga; Passiv ljudisolering; Övrigt
fi: Melunvaimennustekniikka: Aktiivinen melunvaimennus (ANC); Mukautuva melunvaimennus; Ympäristömelun vaimennus (ENC); Ei mitään; Passiivinen melun eristys; Muu
tr: Gürültü engelleme teknolojisi: Aktif gürültü engelleme (ANC); Uyarlanabilir gürültü engelleme; Çevresel gürültü engelleme (ENC); Hiçbiri; Pasif gürültü yalıtımı; Diğer
pt-PT: Tecnologia de cancelamento de ruído: Cancelamento ativo de ruído (ANC); Cancelamento adaptativo de ruído; Cancelamento de ruído ambiental (ENC); Nenhum; Isolamento passivo de ruído; Outro
sk-SK: Technológia potlačenia hluku: Aktívne potlačenie hluku (ANC); Adaptívne potlačenie hluku; Potlačenie okolitého hluku (ENC); Žiadny; Pasívna izolácia hluku; Iné
th: เทคโนโลยีตัดเสียงรบกวน: การตัดเสียงรบกวนแบบแอคทีฟ (ANC); การตัดเสียงรบกวนแบบปรับตัว; การตัดเสียงรบกวนจากสิ่งแวดล้อม (ENC); ไม่มี; การแยกเสียงรบกวนแบบพาสซีฟ; อื่นๆ
es: Tecnología de cancelación de ruido: Cancelación activa de ruido (ANC); Cancelación adaptativa de ruido; Cancelación de ruido ambiental (ENC); Ninguno; Aislamiento pasivo de ruido; Otros
bg-BG: Технология за намаляване на шума: Активно шумопотискане (ANC); Адаптивно шумопотискане; Потискане на околен шум (ENC); Няма; Пасивна шумоизолация; Други
sl-SI: Tehnologija odprave hrupa: Aktivno dušenje hrupa (ANC); Prilagodljivo dušenje hrupa; Okoljsko dušenje hrupa (ENC); Brez; Pasivna zvočna izolacija; Drugo
nb: Støyreduksjonsteknologi: Aktiv støyreduksjon (ANC); Adaptiv støyreduksjon; Miljøstøyreduksjon (ENC); Ingen; Passiv støyisolering; Annet
it: Tecnologia di cancellazione del rumore: Cancellazione attiva del rumore (ANC); Cancellazione adattiva del rumore; Cancellazione del rumore ambientale (ENC); Nessuna; Isolamento passivo del rumore; Altro
lt-LT: Triukšmo slopinimo technologija: Aktyvus triukšmo slopinimas (ANC); Adaptyvus triukšmo slopinimas; Aplinkos triukšmo slopinimas (ENC); Nėra; Pasyvi triukšmo izoliacija; Kita
fr: Technologie de suppression du bruit: Réduction active du bruit (ANC); Réduction adaptative du bruit; Réduction du bruit environnemental (ENC); Aucune; Isolation passive du bruit; Autre